California statutes. Education Code
 childcare services from the Superintendent of Public Instruction in excess of 75 percent of the standard reimbursement rate for campus childcare programs. Campus childcare programs operated by the University of California, the California State University, and community colleges that did not levy a permissive override tax in the 1977–78 fiscal year shall receive reimbursement from the Superintendent of Public Instruction that equals 100 percent of the standard reimbursement rate for campus
 childcare and development programs.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8330 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 154.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Childcare Subsidy Plan for the City and County of San Francisco  [8283. - 8288.5.]

8283.

The City and County of San Francisco may develop and implement an individualized county childcare subsidy plan. The plan shall ensure that childcare subsidies received by the city and county are used to address local needs, conditions, and priorities of
 working families in the community.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8335 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 169.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8284.

Before implementing the local subsidy plan, the City and County of San Francisco, in consultation with the department, shall develop an individualized county childcare subsidy plan for the city and county that includes the following four elements:

(a) An assessment to identify the city and county’s goal for its subsidized
 childcare system. The assessment shall examine whether the current structure of subsidized childcare funding adequately supports working families in the city and county and whether the city and county’s childcare goals coincide with the state’s requirements for funding, eligibility, priority, and reimbursement. The assessment shall also identify barriers in the state’s childcare
 subsidy system that inhibit the city and county from meeting its childcare goals. In conducting the assessment, the city and county shall consider all of the following:

(1) The general demographics of families who are in need of childcare, including employment, income, language, ethnic, and family composition.

(2) The current supply of available subsidized
 childcare.

(3) The level of need for various types of subsidized childcare services including, but not limited to, infant care, after-hours care, and care for children with exceptional needs.

(4) The city and county’s self-sufficiency income level.

(5) Income eligibility levels for subsidized
 childcare.

(6) Family fees.

(7) The cost of providing childcare.

(8) The regional market rates, as established by the department, for different types of childcare.

(9) The standard reimbursement rate or state per diem for centers operating under contracts with the department.

(10) Trends in the county’s unemployment rate and housing affordability index.

(b) Development of a local policy to eliminate state-imposed regulatory barriers to the city and county’s achievement of its desired outcomes for subsidized preschool.

(1) The local policy shall do all of the following:

(A) Prioritize lowest income families first.

(B) Follow the family fee schedule established pursuant to Section 8252 of this code or Section 10290 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, as applicable, for those families that are income eligible, as defined by Section
 8213 of this code or Section 10271.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, as applicable.

(C) Meet local goals that are consistent with the state’s childcare goals.

(D) Identify existing policies that would be affected by the city and county’s childcare
 subsidy plan.

(E) (i) Authorize any agency that provides childcare and development services in the city and county through a contract with the department to apply to the department to amend existing contracts in order to benefit from the local policy once it is adopted.

(ii) The department shall approve an application to amend an existing contract if the childcare subsidy plan is approved pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section
 8285, or modified pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section
 8285.

(iii) The contract of a department contractor who does not elect to request an amendment to its contract remains operative and enforceable.

(2) (A) The city and county shall, by the end of the first fiscal year of operation under the approved childcare subsidy plan, demonstrate an increase in the aggregate child days of enrollment in the county as compared to the enrollment in the final quarter of the 2004–05 fiscal year.

(B) The amount of the increase shall be at least equal to the aggregate child days of enrollment in the final quarter of the
 2004–05 fiscal year for all contracts amended as provided in subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1), under which the contractor receives an increase in its reimbursement rate, times 2 percent.

(C) The amount of the increase shall also be proportional to the total contract maximum reimbursable amount to reflect the changes in the budget allocation for each fiscal year of the plan.

(3) The local policy may supersede state law concerning preschool subsidy programs with regard only to the following factors:

(A) Provide a family that qualifies for the second or third stage of
 childcare services pursuant to Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370) of Part 1.8 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, for purposes of eligibility, fees, and reimbursements, the same or higher level of benefit as a family that qualifies for subsidized childcare on another basis pursuant to the local policy, except as otherwise provided in
 Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370) of Part 1.8 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to impact or reduce any element in the second or third stage of childcare services pursuant to Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370) of Part 1.8 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code that provides a greater benefit to participating families than is provided for in the local policy.

(B) Fees including, but
 not limited to, family fees, sliding scale fees, and copayments for those families that are not income eligible, as defined by Section 8213 of this code or Section 10271.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, as applicable.

(C) Reimbursement rates, including adjustment factors identified in Section 8244 of this code or Section 10281.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, as applicable.

(D) The ratio of four-year-old children in state preschool programs pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8263.

(E) Methods of maximizing the efficient use of subsidy funds, including, but not limited to, multiyear contracting with the department for center-based
 childcare
 and interagency agreements that allow for flexible and temporary transfer of funds among agencies.

(F) Families with children enrolled in part-day California state preschool program services, pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section
 8207), may be eligible for up to two 180-day periods within a 24-month period without the family being certified as a new enrollment each year.

(c) Recognition that all funding sources utilized by contractors that provide childcare and development services in the city and county are eligible to be included in the preschool subsidy plan of the city and county.

(d) Establishment of measurable outcomes to evaluate the success of the plan to achieve the city and county’s
 childcare goals and to overcome any barriers identified in the state’s childcare subsidy system.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit the city and county to change the regional market rate survey results for the city and county.

(f) Nothing in this section shall allow the city and county to
 adopt as part of its plan an increase to the regional market reimbursement rate beyond the level provided in the Budget Act.

(g) The plan may include stage one childcare services in addition to alternative payment and direct service childcare programs. If the plan includes CalWORKs childcare, the plan administrator shall consult with their county
 welfare department to identify opportunities for alignment, ensuring families experience no break in their
 childcare services due to a transition between the three stages of childcare services and policies implemented in the plan.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8335.1 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 170.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8285.

(a) The plan shall be submitted to the local planning council, as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 10480 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, for approval. Upon approval of the plan by the local planning council, the Board of Supervisors of the City and County of San Francisco shall hold at least one public hearing on the plan. Following the hearing, if the board of supervisors votes in favor of the plan, the plan shall be
 submitted to the department for review.

(b) Within 30 days of receiving the plan, the department shall review and either approve or disapprove the plan.

(c) Within 30 days of receiving any modification to the plan, the department shall review and either approve or disapprove that modification to the plan.

(d) The department may disapprove only those portions of the plan or modifications to the plan that are not in conformance with either this article or Article 9 (commencing with Section
 8273) or that are in conflict with federal law.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8335.3 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 171.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8286.

(a) The City and County of San Francisco shall, at least once every three years, using the template developed by the department, prepare and submit to the Legislature, the State Department of Social Services, and the department a report that summarizes the success of the city and county’s plan, and the city and county’s ability to maximize the use of funds and to improve and stabilize childcare in the city and county.

(b) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8335.4 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 172.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8287.

Any modifications to the plan shall be submitted in conformance with the procedures established in Article 9 (commencing with Section 8273).

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8335.5 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 173.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8288.

A participating contractor shall receive any increase or decrease in funding that the contractor would have received if the contractor had not participated in the local subsidy plan established by this article.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8335.6 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 174.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8288.5.

Commencing on the effective date of the act that added this section, the components of the plan relating to preschool shall be overseen by the department and the components of the plan addressing all other childcare programs shall be overseen by the State Department of Social Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 138.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Individualized County of San Mateo Childcare Subsidy Plan  [8289. - 8294.5.]

8289.

On and after July 1, 2014, the individualized county childcare subsidy plan for the County of San Mateo that was developed as a pilot project pursuant to Article 15.3 (commencing with Section 8340), as that article read on January 1, 2013, may continue in existence and may be implemented in accordance with the provisions of this article. The plan shall ensure that
 childcare subsidies received by the County of San Mateo are used to address local needs, conditions, and priorities of working families in those communities.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8347 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 178.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8290.

For purposes of this article, “county” means the County of San Mateo.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8347.1 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 179.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8291.

For purposes of this article, “plan” means an individualized county childcare subsidy plan developed and approved as described in Section 8289, which
 includes all of the following:

(a) An assessment to identify the county’s goal for its subsidized childcare system. The assessment shall examine whether the current structure of subsidized childcare funding adequately supports working families in the county and whether the county’s childcare goals coincide with the state’s requirements for
 funding, eligibility, priority, and reimbursement. The assessment shall also identify barriers in the state’s
 childcare subsidy system that inhibit the county from meeting its childcare goals. In conducting the assessment, the county shall consider all of the following:

(1) The general demographics of families who are in need of childcare, including employment, income, language, ethnic, and family composition.

(2) The current supply of
 available subsidized
 childcare.

(3) The level of need for various types of subsidized childcare services, including, but not limited to, infant care, after-hours care, and care for children with exceptional needs.

(4) The county’s self-sufficiency income level.

(5) Income eligibility levels for subsidized
 childcare.

(6) Family fees.

(7) The cost of providing childcare.

(8) The regional market rates, as established by the department, for different types of childcare.

(9) The standard reimbursement rate or state per diem for centers operating under contracts with the department.

(10) Trends in the county’s unemployment rate and housing affordability index.

(b) (1) Development of a local policy to eliminate state-imposed regulatory barriers to the county’s achievement of its desired outcomes for subsidized
 childcare.

(2) The local policy shall do all of the following:

(A) Prioritize lowest income families first.

(B) Follow the family fee schedule established pursuant to Section 8252 of this code or Section 10290 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, as applicable, for those families that are income eligible, as defined by Section 8213 of this code or Section 10271.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, as
 applicable.

(C) Meet local goals that are consistent with the state’s
 childcare
 goals.

(D) Identify existing policies that would be affected by the county’s plan.

(E) (i) Authorize any agency that provides childcare and development services in the county through a contract with the department to apply to the department to amend existing contracts in order to benefit from the local policy.

(ii) The department shall approve an application to amend an existing contract if the plan is modified pursuant to Section
 8292.

(iii) The contract of a department contractor who does not elect to request an amendment to its contract remains operative and enforceable.

(3) The local policy may supersede state law concerning childcare subsidy programs with regard only to the following factors:

(A) Provide a family that qualifies for the second or third stage of childcare services pursuant to
 Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370) of Part 1.8 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, for purposes of eligibility, fees, and reimbursements, the same or higher level of benefit as a family that qualifies for subsidized childcare on another basis pursuant to the local policy, except as otherwise provided in Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370) of Part 1.8 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to impact or reduce any element in the second or third
 stage of
 childcare
 services pursuant to
 Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370) of Part 1.8 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code that provides a greater benefit to participating families than is provided for in the local policy.

(B) Fees, including, but not limited to, family fees, sliding scale fees, and copayments for those families that are not income eligible, as defined by Section 8213 of this code or Section 10271.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, as applicable.

(C) Reimbursement rates, including adjustment factors identified in Section
 8244 of this code or Section 10281.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, as applicable.

(D) The ratio of four-year-old children in state preschool programs pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8263.

(E) Methods of maximizing the efficient use of subsidy funds, including, but not limited to, multiyear contracting with the department for
 preschool, and interagency agreements that allow for flexible and temporary transfer of funds among agencies.

(F) Families with children enrolled in part-day California state preschool program services, pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section
 8207), may be eligible for up to two 180-day periods within a 24-month period without the family being certified as a new enrollment each year.

(c) Recognition that all funding sources utilized by contractors that provide childcare and development services in the county are eligible to be included in the county’s plan.

(d) Establishment of measurable outcomes to evaluate the success of the plan to achieve the county’s
 childcare goals, and to overcome any barriers identified in the state’s childcare subsidy system.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit the county to change the regional market rate survey results for the county.

(f) Nothing in this section shall allow the county to adopt as part of its plan an increase to the regional market reimbursement rate beyond the level provided in the Budget Act.

(g) The plan may include stage one
 childcare services in addition to alternative payment and direct service childcare programs. If the plan includes CalWORKs childcare, the plan administrator shall consult with their county welfare department to identify opportunities for alignment, ensuring families experience no break in their childcare services due to a transition between the three stages of
 childcare services and policies implemented in the plan.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8347.2 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 180.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8292.

(a) Except as provided in this section, any modifications to the plan shall be submitted in accordance with the modification procedures described in Article 9 (commencing with Section 8273).

(b) Within 30 days of receiving any modification to the plan, the department shall review and either approve or disapprove that modification to the plan.

(c) The department may disapprove only those portions of modifications to the plan that are not in conformance with either this article or Article 9 (commencing with Section 8273) or that are in conflict with federal law.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8347.3 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 181.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8293.

(a) The county shall at least once every three years, using the template developed by the department, prepare and submit to the Legislature, the State Department of Social Services, and the department a report that summarizes the success of the county’s plan, and the county’s ability to maximize the use of funds and to improve and stabilize
 childcare in the county.

(b) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8347.4 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 182.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8294.

A participating contractor shall receive any increase or decrease in funding that the contractor would have received if the contractor had not participated in the plan.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8347.5 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 183.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8294.5.

Commencing on the effective date of the act that added this section, the components of the plan relating to preschool shall be overseen by the department and the components of the plan addressing all other childcare programs shall be overseen by the State Department of Social Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 140.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Child Development Program Personnel Qualifications [8295. - 8305.]

8295.

(a) (1) Preschool programs shall include a career ladder program for classroom staff. Persons who are 18 years of age and older may be employed as aides and may be eligible for salary increases upon the completion of additional semester units in early childhood education or child development. The governing board of each contracting agency shall be encouraged to
 provide teachers and aides with salary increases for the successful completion of early childhood education or child development courses in six semester unit increments.

(2) Persons employed as teachers in a preschool program shall possess a permit issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing authorizing service in the care, development, and instruction of children in a childcare and development program.

(b) Any person who meets the following criteria is eligible to serve in an instructional capacity in a
 preschool program:

(1) Possesses a current credential issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing authorizing teaching service in elementary school or a single subject credential in home economics.

(2) Twelve units in early childhood education or child development, or both, or two years’ experience in early childhood education or a childcare and development program.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8360 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 186.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8297.

Not later than 95 days after the governing board of a public agency sets the date a person employed by that board shall begin service in a position requiring a children’s center instructional permit or a children’s center supervision permit, that person shall file, on or before that date, with the county superintendent of schools a valid permit issued on or before that date, authorizing the person to serve in a
 position for which the person was employed. Upon renewal of that permit, that person shall file that renewal with the county superintendent of schools no later than 95 days after the renewal.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8360.2 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 188.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8298.

(a) An entity operating preschool programs providing services to children at two or more sites, including through more than one contract or subcontract funded pursuant to this chapter, shall employ a program director who possesses one of the following:

(1) A permit issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing authorizing supervision of a childcare and development program operating in multiple sites.

(2) Any person who meets the following criteria is eligible to supervise a preschool program operating in multiple sites and serve in an instructional capacity in a preschool program:

(A) Possesses a current
 credential issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing authorizing teaching service in elementary school or a single subject credential in home economics.

(B) Six units in administration and supervision of early childhood education or child development, or both. The requirement set forth in this paragraph does not apply to any person who was employed as a program director prior to January 1, 1993, in a preschool program receiving funding under this chapter.

(C) Twelve units in early childhood education or child development, or both, or at least two years’ experience in early childhood education or a preschool program.

(3) A waiver issued by the Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to this section.

(b) (1) For
 purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(A) “Administrative responsibility” means awareness of the financial and business circumstances of the program, and, in appropriate cases, supervision of administrative and support personnel and the knowledge and authority to direct or modify administrative practices and procedures to ensure compliance to administrative and financial standards imposed by law.

(B) “Program director” means a person who, regardless of their title, has programmatic and administrative responsibility for an early childhood program that provides services to children at two or more sites.

(C) “Programmatic responsibility” means overall supervision of curriculum and instructional staff, including instructional aides, and the knowledge and authority to direct or modify program
 practices and procedures to ensure compliance to applicable quality and health and safety standards imposed by law.

(2) “Administrative responsibility” and “programmatic responsibility” also include the responsibility to act as the representative for the preschool program to the department. With respect to preschool programs operated through family childcare homes, “administrative responsibility” and “programmatic responsibility” include ensuring that quality services are provided in the family childcare homes.

(c) The program director may also serve as the site supervisor at one of the sites, provided that the program director fulfills both the duties of a “childcare center director,” as set forth in Section 101215.1 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, and meets the qualifications for a site supervisor, as set forth in Section 8205.

(d) The Superintendent of Public Instruction may waive the qualifications for a program director upon a finding of either of the following circumstances:

(1) The applicant is making satisfactory progress toward securing a permit issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing authorizing supervision of a childcare and development program operating in two or more sites or fulfilling the qualifications for program directors of childcare and development programs that provide service to severely disabled children, as specified in Section 10381.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) The place of employment is so remote from institutions offering the necessary coursework as to make continuing education impracticable and the contractor has made a diligent search but has been unable to hire a more qualified
 applicant.

(e) The Superintendent of Public Instruction, upon good cause, may, by rule, identify and apply grounds, in addition to those specified in subdivision (d), for granting a waiver of the qualifications for program director.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 142.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8299.

Notwithstanding any other law, a high school student or any other adult shall be selected by the governing board of a public or private agency to serve as nonteaching personnel to perform noninstructional work. A career ladder shall be utilized in the employment and promotion of such
 noninstructional personnel. Each such person shall have had a health examination made within the 12-month period preceding the date of employment. Each person shall also submit duplicate personal identification cards upon which shall appear legible fingerprints and a personal description of the applicant.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8361 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 190.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8300.

The same fee as that prescribed for a credential provided in Section 44235 shall be charged for either the issuance or renewal of each child development permit authorizing service in the supervision and instruction of children in child development programs or authorizing service as a supervisor in a program.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8362 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 191.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8301.

The Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall by rule or regulation establish the requirements for the following:

(a) The issuance and the renewal of permits authorizing service in the care, development, and instruction of children in childcare and development programs, as well as the issuance of emergency permits for this purpose.

(b) The issuance and renewal of permits authorizing supervision of a childcare and development program, as well as the issuance of emergency permits for this purpose.

(c) The periods of duration of the permits set forth in this section.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8363 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 192.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8301.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 8295 and 8301, the Commission on Teacher Credentialing may issue an assistant teacher permit that authorizes the permitholder to assist in the care, development, and instruction of children, subject to the supervision requirements described in subdivision (b). This assistance may include temporarily supervising children independently for no more than 120 minutes per day while the supervising employee leaves the classroom for purposes of offering flexibility for classroom support, during breaks, or escorting children outside of the classroom. The commission may issue a permit under this section provided that all
 of the following requirements are met:

(1) The applicant has at least six units from an accredited institution of higher education in early childhood education, child development, or human development, or a combination thereof.

(2) The applicant has an education plan updated each academic year and is enrolled in a course or courses to meet the requirements for the next level permit.

(3) The applicant is sponsored by an employer who has a current contract with the State Department of Education to be a California state preschool program provider.

(b) An employee who holds an assistant teacher permit pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be under the supervision of an
 employee who holds a valid commission-issued child development permit at the teacher level, or at an equivalent or higher permit level.

(c) A contracting agency that employs a person who holds an assistant teacher permit pursuant to subdivision (a) shall maintain a copy of the permitholder’s current education plan in their employee file.

(d) A permit issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be valid for no more than two years from the date of issuance and shall not be renewed.

(e) The number of assistant teacher permitholders employed by a contracting agency at one site shall not exceed 50 percent of the number of classrooms at that site. The contracting agency shall not assign more than one assistant teacher to each classroom.

(f) This section shall not be construed to grant to a person issued with an assistant teacher permit pursuant to this section with the rights and responsibilities of an associate teacher permitholder, or equivalent permitholder, or higher permitholder.

(g) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement this section by means of management bulletins or similar instructions until regulations are adopted.

(h) The commission shall implement this section by no later than January 30, 2026.

(i) This section shall become inoperative one year after the implementation of the commission’s revised child development permit matrix, or January 1, 2029, whichever is later, and, as of that date, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 165, Sec. 3.   (AB 753)   Effective October 1, 2025.   Conditionally repealed on or after January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8301.5.

Notwithstanding Section 8301 of this code or Section 80111 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, on or before April 30, 2025, the Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall, by rule or regulation, authorize a holder of a Child Development Associate Teacher Permit to renew their permit without a limitation on the number of renewals if the permitholder completes specified hours of professional growth activities, as determined by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 687, Sec. 1.   (AB 1930)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8302.

Each county board of education, city and county board of education, or community college governing board may issue temporary certificates for the purpose of authorizing salary payments to preschool employees whose child development permit applications are being processed. The applicant for the temporary certificate shall make a statement under oath that the applicant has duly filed their application for a permit, together with the required fee, and that to the best of their knowledge no reason exists why they should not be issued a permit. The temporary certificate shall be valid for not more than 90 schooldays and only until the permit originally requested is either issued or denied by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 471, Sec. 7.   (SB 1329)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8303.

(a) Each person employed by a public or private agency in a position requiring a child development permit for the supervision and instruction of children, or for service as a physician, dentist, or nurse, or in the supervision of the
 preschool program, shall be deemed to be employed in a position requiring certification qualifications.

(b) Each other person employed by an agency in a preschool program under the provisions of this chapter
 shall be deemed for all purposes, including retirement, to be a person employed by the agency in a position not requiring certification qualifications.

(c) A district may lay off an employee required to have such a permit at any time during the school year for lack of work or lack
 of funds or may provide for the employee’s employment for not to exceed 90 days in any one school year on an intermittent basis which shall not be deemed probationary service. The order of layoff shall be determined by length of service. The employee who has served the shortest time shall be laid off first, except that no permanent employee shall be laid off ahead of a probationary employee. A permanent employee who has been laid off shall hold reinstatement rights for a period of 39 months from the date of layoff.

(d) Other
 persons who are employed as probationary employees in positions requiring such permits on or after September 18, 1959, may be dismissed in accordance with the provisions of Section 44949 or 87740.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8366 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 197.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8304.

Every employee of a child development program who before their employment in such program was employed by the agency maintaining such program in a position entitling the employee to membership in, and who was a member of, the
 retirement system maintained by such district, and if such employee’s contributions to such retirement system were returned to the employee when the employee was employed in the program, the employee shall have the right to elect, by written document filed with the Board of Administration, Public Employees’ Retirement System, at any time within 90 days after the date upon which the notice of the right to make
 that election is mailed by such system, either to the member’s latest address on file in the office of such system, or to the office of the governing board of such agency or agencies, and prior to the date of retirement, to contribute to such system, subject to minimum payments fixed by the Board of Administration, and in one or more sums, or in not to exceed 60 monthly payments, an amount which, when added to the employee’s accumulated contributions, including interest, transferred as required in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 24810, will make a total amount equal to the accumulated contributions, including interest, which would have been credited to
 the employee in such plan, if the employee had never had their contributions returned. Such employee shall pay to the Public Employees’ Retirement System interest on the unpaid balance of the amount payable to such system, beginning with the date of transfer, at the rate of interest currently used from time to time under the system. If such employee elects to make, and makes,
 such contributions and pays such interest, but not otherwise, the employee shall receive credit under such employees’ system, as state service, for all prior service rendered while the employee was not a member of such plan.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8369 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 200.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8305.

The Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall establish standards for the issuance of the permits herein provided for. The standards may be changed from time to time, but changes therein shall not affect then valid permits issued to persons.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8370 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 201.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Administrative Review  [8306. - 8319.]

8306.

It is the intent of the Legislature to authorize an appeal process for the resolution of disputes between the department and local agencies which contract with the department pursuant
 to Section 8233 to provide
 preschool services or to furnish property, facilities, personnel, supplies, equipment and administrative services.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8401 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 205.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8307.

(a) The department shall provide an internal appeal procedure to resolve a dispute between the department and a contracting agency providing preschool services pursuant to Section 8233 regarding the interpretation or
 application of a term or condition of a contract, or to dispute a finding made by the department resulting from a fiscal or programmatic review, including, but not limited to, an error rate notification.

(b) A contracting agency shall have the right to appeal the findings of a fiscal or programmatic review, including, but not limited to, an error rate finding, by submitting a request for appeal in accordance with the internal appeal procedure developed by the department pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8401.5 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 206.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8309.
